Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CULTURALLY SPECIFIC PEER RECOVERY AND OUTREACH PROGRAMS.new text end new text begin (a) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to Generation Hope. The funds must be used to enhance culturally specific peer recovery and outreach programs, including: new text end new text begin (1) expanding culturally relevant peer recovery support services to meet the diverse needs of individuals in recovery; new text end new text begin (2) conducting targeted outreach to underserved communities to increase access to recovery resources; new text end new text begin (3) providing training and professional development for peer recovery specialists to ensure culturally informed care; and new text end new text begin (4) partnering with community-based organizations to strengthen connections and provide wraparound support services for participants. new text end new text begin (b) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end